tests/хуняма.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    App: hfst-optimised-lookup
    Gen: ../chv.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../chv.automorf.hfst

Tests:

  "Сӑмах хуняма":
    хуняма<n><nom> :  хуняма 
    хуняма<n><px1sg><nom> :  хунямам 
    хуняма<n><px2sg><nom> :  хуняму 
    хуняма<n><px3sp><nom> :  хунямӑшӗ 
    хуняма<n><px1pl><nom> :  хунямамӑр 
    хуняма<n><px2pl><nom> :  хунямӑр 
